Washington statutes.
RCW 15.08.130

Record of premises disinfected—Costs—Lien.

The inspector disinfecting any horticultural premises shall make and sign a detailed record of the proceedings, stating the legal description of the premises; give the name of the owner or reputed owner; the date of inspection and the results thereof; date and manner of giving notice to disinfect; failure to disinfect; disinfection by the inspector; and the cost thereof in detail. If the cost is not paid within five days from the completion of the disinfecting, the inspector shall file with the auditor of the county in which the premises are situated two verified copies of the above record, and a claim of lien against the premises for the amount of the costs and therein refer to the record, which the auditor shall record as other lien claims. The auditor shall charge the same fees as are charged for filing and recording other liens.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.08.130. Prior: 1927 c 311 s 5, part; 1921 c 141 s 5, part; 1915 c 166 s 14, part; RRS s 2852, part.]